src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! # Proper noun inflection
! ----------------------

!! Komi proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns.

!! ## Temporary lexica

LEXICON ACRON-F
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Src/F: ACRON ;

LEXICON ACRON-F_plc
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Src/F+Sem/Plc: ACRON ;

LEXICON ACRON_plc
+Sem/Plc: ACRON ;

LEXICON ACRON
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
@U.Cap.Obl@+Acron:@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_ ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+Acron:@U.Cap.Obl@-яс CASEPOSSLEX ; !acronyms with plural
@U.Cap.Obl@+Acron+A:@U.Cap.Obl@-са A_ ; !2021-06-01

LEXICON PROP_fem !
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_rus_ !
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
PROP_ ;
!PROP_-DERIVABLE

LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC_V/L_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PARAGOGIC_V/L ;
LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC_V/L_mal
+Sem/Mal: PROP_PARAGOGIC_V/L ;
LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC_V/L
 NMN_PARAGOGIC_V/L ;

! Basic proper nouns.
LEXICON PROP_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
@U.Cap.Obl@+Sg:@U.Cap.Obl@ CASEPOSSLEX ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+Pl:@U.Cap.Obl@%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ; !Reinstalling plural morphology 2019-06-03

LEXICON Prop_R_RY
: N_ruskpv_R_RY_hasnat ; ! This will bring about problems with ordering 2012-02-07

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ## Russian type Surnames 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!! Preparing for the template urj-Cyrl
!! Beginning 2012-11-15
LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

!LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR 
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

LEXICON CYRL-L_SUR 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ; ! NO REASON FOR THIS 20260607 :2 PropSur-kal ; !!= * @CODE@ These are foreign Л words

!LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;! PropSur-kit ;

LEXICON PROP_event
+Sem/Event: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_txt
+Sem/Txt: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_surfem
+Sem/Sur-Fem: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_surmal
+Sem/Sur-Mal: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM !!= * @CODE@ giella-shared
 PROP_surfem ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;

!! Абдеев:Абдеев
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
: PropSurMal-kal ;
:а PropSurFem-kudo ;

!! Багрий:Багр
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
:ий PropSurMal-kal ;
:яя PropSurFem-kudo ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL
 Deriv_RUS_IN_SURMAL ;
LEXICON Deriv_RUS_IN_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;

!! Аморский:Аморск
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
:ий PropSurMal-kal ;
:ая PropSurFem-kudo ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
:ой PropSurMal-kal ;
:ая PropSurFem-kudo ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-YJ_SURMAL
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
:ый PropSurMal-kal ;
:ая PropSurFem-kudo ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ## PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!LEXICON PROP_plc_KAL
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
!+Sem/Plc+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

!LEXICON PROP_plc_KIT
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
!+Sem/Plc+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

!LEXICON PROP_plc_KUDO
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
!+Sem/Plc+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_plc_OSH
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Plc+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

!! These are vowel-final stems
!! They have previously received +Sem/Fem tags

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_MA !!= * @CODE@ Ага+Sem/Fem:Аг 
!2018-10-21!+Sg:а  CASEPOSSLEX ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_NA	!!= * @CODE@ Ада+Sem/Fem:Ад
!2018-10-21!+Sg:а  CASEPOSSLEX ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_NIA	!!= * @CODE@ Аня+Sem/Fem:Ан
!2018-10-21!+Sg:я  CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM
+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;
!LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM
!+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;
!LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL
!+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;
!LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;


LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM
+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM
+Sem/Patr-Fem: PROP_ ; 

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRMAL
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Patr-Mal: PROP_ ; 
LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_OSH_FEM
+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_OSH_MAL
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;
LEXICON PROP_OSH_PATRMAL
+Sem/Patr: PROP_ ;
!LEXICON PROP_OSH_SUR
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ## Male given name for deriving patronyms 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ
+Sem/Patr-Mal: NMN_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ ; !! Should this be limited to +Sg? 2015-09-06

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
!! Вили:Вил
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:ьевич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:ьевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:и PROP_KAL_MAL ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-YYA-Yich
!2018-10-21!!! Илья:Иль
!2018-10-21!:ич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
!2018-10-21!:ьишна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
!2018-10-21!:я PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ьич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:иевич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:иевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ьич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:ьевич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:ьевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
!! Андрей:Андре
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:евич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:евна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:й PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:евич PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:евна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ь PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
+Der/Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:ыч PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:ович PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ;
+Der/Patr:овна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_KAL_MAL ;



LEXICON PropSurMal-kal
+Sem/Sur-Mal: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PropSurFem-kudo
+Sem/Sur-Fem: PROP_ ;

!LEXICON PropSur-kal
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

!LEXICON PropSur-kit
! PropSur-kal ;

!LEXICON PropSur-lak
! PropSur-kal ;

!LEXICON PropSur-osh
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;


!LEXICON PropSur-kudo
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_ ;

!! Ending 2012-11-15



!!!! 2015-09-06


!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-Derivable
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Sur-Mal: PROP_ ; ! Владимиров
!2018-10-21!а+Sem/Sur-Fem+Sg:%^FEM%>а CASEPOSSLEX ; ! Владимирова

! Prop-Derivable end  in: ев, ов, ёв, ий, ин
! Prop-Derivable for fem: ева, ова, ёва, ая, ина


!This might need some working on 2012-01-23
LEXICON PROP_MAL_DERIVABLE !Patronyms
ович+Sem/Patr-Mal+Sg:%>ович CASEPOSSLEX ; ! Владимирович
овна+Sem/Patr-Fem+Sg:%>овна CASEPOSSLEX ; ! Владимировна
 PROP_mal ; ! Владимир

!! FEMALE NAMES FROM TEMPLATE
!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-kal_fem
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: NMN_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-lak_fem
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: NMN_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-kit_fem
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: NMN_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-osh_fem
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: NMN_ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON Prop-kudo_fem
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: NMN_ ;
 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ## PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PROP_PLC_01
@U.Cap.Obl@+Sg:@U.Cap.Obl@ CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+Sg:@U.Cap.Opt@ DENOMINAL_LOCATIVE_ADJECTIVES ; !!= * **@CODE@** This requires down-casing

LEXICON PROP_plc ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PLC_01 ;
