src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Абъятар+N+Prop:Абъятар PROP_ "Abjatar" ;
Агни+N+Prop:Агни PROP_fem ;
Агрикола+N+Prop:Агрикола PROP_ "Agricola" ;
Агриппина+N+Prop:Агриппина PROP_fem ;
Але+N+Prop:Але PROP_fem ;
Аля+N+Prop:Аля PROP_fem ;
Анкей+N+Prop:Анкей PROP_fem ;
Антонида+N+Prop:Антонида PROP_fem ;
Анэй+N+Prop:Анэй PROP_fem ;
Апраксия+N+Prop:Апраксия PROP_fem ;
Аргументы% и% факты+N+Prop:Аргументы% и% факты PROP_txt "Argumenty i fakty (-sanomalehti)" ;
Ариматияса+N+Prop:Ариматияса PROP_ ;
Байтек% Силур% компания+N+Prop:Байтек% Силур% компания PROP_plc ;
Белорус+N+Prop:Белорус PROP_plc "Valkovenäjä" ;
Библия+N+Prop:Библия PROP_txt "Raamattu" ;
Болгария+N+Prop:Болгария PROP_plc "Bulgaria" ;
Бурводстрой+N+Prop:Бурводстрой PROP_plc ;
Буско+N+Prop:Буско PROP_ ;
Вад+N+Prop:Вад PROP_ "Vad" ;
Варвара+N+Prop:Варвара PROP_fem ;
Васильевна+N+Prop:Васильевна PROP_ ;
Васса+N+Prop:Васса PROP_fem ;
Вашка+N+Prop:Вашка PROP_ "Vaška" ;
вежавож+N+Prop:вежавож PROP_ ;
Венесуэла+N+Prop:Венесуэла PROP_plc ;
Виз+N+Prop:Виз PROP_ "Viz" ;
Вика+N+Prop:Вика PROP_fem ;
викинг+N+Prop:викинг PROP_ "viikinki" ;
Вологда+N+Prop:Вологда PROP_plc "Vologda" ;
Волся+N+Prop:Волся PROP_ "Volsja" ;
Вылькар+N+Prop:Вылькар PROP_plc ;
Галю+N+Prop:Галю PROP_fem ;
Гачань+N+Prop:Гачань PROP_ ;
Глапира+N+Prop:Глапира PROP_fem ;
Гольфстрим+N+Prop:Гольфстрим PROP_plc "Golfvirta" ;
Грапир+N+Prop:Грапир PROP_fem ;
Греция+N+Prop:Греция PROP_plc "Kreikka" ;
Далманута+N+Prop:Далманута PROP_ ;
Дорофея+N+Prop:Дорофея PROP_fem ;
Евангелие+N+Prop:Евангелие PROP_txt ;
Евлалия+N+Prop:Евлалия PROP_fem ;
Европа+N+Prop:Европа PROP_plc "Eurooppa" ;
Ель+N+Prop:Ель PROP_fem ;
Ереван+N+Prop:Ереван PROP_plc ;
Зимстан+N+Prop:Зимстан PROP_ ;
Ижкар+N+Prop:Ижкар PROP_plc "Ižkar (Iževsk)" ;
Индия+N+Prop:Индия PROP_plc "Intia" ;
Ириння+N+Prop:Ириння PROP_fem ;
Иркутск+N+Prop:Иркутск PROP_plc ;
Италия+N+Prop:Италия PROP_plc "Italia" ;
Каледония+N+Prop:Каледония PROP_plc ;
Карелия+N+Prop:Карелия PROP_plc "Karjala" ;
Картин+N+Prop:Картин PROP_fem ;
Катшыс+N+Prop:Катшыс PROP_ ;
Кекур+N+Prop:Кекур PROP_ ;
Китай+N+Prop:Китай PROP_plc "Kiina" ;
Клавдей+N+Prop:Клавдей PROP_fem ;
Клапорд+N+Prop:Клапорд PROP_ ;
Комибанк+N+Prop:Комибанк PROP_ ;
Комилесстрой+N+Prop:Комилесстрой PROP_ ;
Коминефть+N+Prop:Коминефть PROP_ "Komineft(-öljy-yhtiö)" ;
Конго+N+Prop:Конго PROP_plc ;
Коряжма+N+Prop:Коряжма PROP_ "Korjažma" ;
Кослан+N+Prop:Кослан PROP_ "Koslan" ;
Котлас+N+Prop:Котлас PROP_plc "Kotlas" ;
КПСС+N+Prop:КПСС ACRON ;
Крестя+N+Prop:Крестя PROP_fem ;
Кудымкар+N+Prop:Кудымкар PROP_plc ;
Ленту+N+Prop:Ленту PROP_fem ;
Летка+N+Prop:Летка PROP_plc "Letka" ;
Лидия+N+Prop:Лидия PROP_ ;
Лизук+N+Prop:Лизук PROP_ ;
Ликерия+N+Prop:Ликерия PROP_fem ;
Луза+N+Prop:Луза PROP_ "Luza" ;
Лыско+N+Prop:Лыско PROP_ ;
Лыюров+EOLang/KOM+N+Prop:Лыюров PROP_surmal ;
Люда+N+Prop:Люда PROP_fem ;
Максаковка+N+Prop:Максаковка PROP_ "Maksakovka" ;
Малайзия+N+Prop:Малайзия PROP_plc ;
Малаш+N+Prop:Малаш PROP_fem ;
Мари+N+Prop:Мари PROP_plc ;
Марина+N+Prop:Марина PROP_fem ;
Марьют+N+Prop:Марьют PROP_fem ;
Машуль+N+Prop:Машуль PROP_fem ;
Мездысь+N+Prop:Мездысь PROP_ "Vapahtaja" ;
Миссисипи+N+Prop:Миссисипи PROP_plc "Mississippi" ;
Мыжы+N+Prop:Мыжы PROP_ "Myžy" ;
Настук+N+Prop:Настук PROP_fem ;
Никарагуа+N+Prop:Никарагуа PROP_plc ;
Новосибирск+N+Prop:Новосибирск PROP_plc "Novosibirsk" ;
Оддя+N+Prop:Оддя PROP_fem ;
Одыб+N+Prop:Одыб PROP_plc "Odyp" ;
Опонась+N+Prop:Опонась PROP_fem ;
Осетия+N+Prop:Осетия PROP_plc ;
Осипова+N+Prop:Осипова PROP_surfem "Osipova" ;
Паль+N+Prop:Паль PROP_ "Pal" ;
Панна+N+Prop:Панна PROP_fem ;
Пая+N+Prop:Пая PROP_fem ;
Печора+N+Prop:Печора PROP_plc "Pečora" ;
Печоранефть+N+Prop:Печоранефть PROP_ "Pečoraneft(-öljy-yhtiö)" ;
Пима+N+Prop:Пима PROP_fem ;
Португалия+N+Prop:Португалия PROP_plc "Portugali" ;
Прося+N+Prop:Прося PROP_fem ;
ПТУ+N+Prop:ПТУ PROP_ ;
Рим+N+Prop:Рим PROP_plc "Rooma" ;
Рудук+N+Prop:Рудук PROP_ ;
Рытань+N+Prop:Рытань PROP_ ;
Самара+N+Prop:Самара PROP_plc ;
Саня+N+Prop:Саня PROP_fem ;
Сибыр+N+Prop:Сибыр PROP_plc ;
СНГ+N+Prop:СНГ ACRON_plc "IVY" ;
Соболь+N+Prop:Соболь PROP_ ;
Сосногорск+N+Prop:Сосногорск PROP_plc "Sosnogorsk" ;
Столля+N+Prop:Столля PROP_fem ;
Суматра+N+Prop:Суматра PROP_plc ;
США+N+Prop:США ACRON-F_plc "Amerikan yhdysvallat" ;
Сыктывкаравтотранс+N+Prop:Сыктывкаравтотранс PROP_ ;
Сысольск+N+Prop:Сысольск PROP_plc ;
Сюрук+N+Prop:Сюрук PROP_ ;
Татьяна+N+Prop:Татьяна PROP_fem ;
Тибет+N+Prop:Тибет PROP_plc ;
Тэбукнефть+N+Prop:Тэбукнефть PROP_ ;
Уллян+N+Prop:Уллян PROP_fem ;
Ульяновск+N+Prop:Ульяновск PROP_plc ;
Усвавом+N+Prop:Усвавом PROP_ "Usvavom" ;
Устя+N+Prop:Устя PROP_fem ;
ЦВК+N+Prop:ЦВК ACRON ;
Чернобыль+N+Prop:Чернобыль PROP_plc "Tšernobyl" ;
Чив+N+Prop:Чив PROP_ ;
Шусюк+N+Prop:Шусюк PROP_fem ;
Эффата+N+Prop:Эффата PROP_ ;
Югославия+N+Prop:Югославия PROP_plc "Jugoslavia" ;
